District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-395.05

Powers of Financial Responsibility and Management Authority unaffected.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 734, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11106
Mar. 5, 1999, 113 Stat. 3, Pub. L. 106-1, § 3(a)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-395.5.